Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3599.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 4012 of Title 56, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Oklahoma Health Care Authority shall file a Medicaid
waiver or state plan amendment, as necessary, on or before January
1, 2027, to impose a cost-sharing requirement of Thirty-five Dollars
($35.00) per provision of care, items, or services for expansion
enrollees, subject to federal limitations on cost-sharing and
eligibility limitations under 42 U.S.C. Section 1396a. The Oklahoma
Health Care Authority shall not reduce the cost-sharing requirement
for an expansion enrollee's nonemergency use of emergency
departments below Thirty-five Dollars ($35.00). The total aggregate
Req. No. 15163 Page 1

amou nt of cost-sharing charges imposed under the state plan for all
individuals in the family may not exceed five percent (5%) of the
family income, as applied on a quarterly basis.
B. A provider participating under the state plan may require as
a condition for the provision of care, items, or services to an
expansion enrollee, payment of cost-sharing charges under the state
plan pursuant to subsection A of this section. The amount of any
required payment of cost-sharing for an expansion enrollee shall be
deducted from the payment to a participating provider, regardless of
whether that provider elects to require payment of such charges.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-15163 TJ 12/17/25











Req. No. 15163 Page 2